New York, session 2025-2026, A1142.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (b) of section 102-c of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as added by section 1 of part XX of chapter 58 of the laws of 2020, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 (b) "Class two bicycle with electric assist." A bicycle with electric 5 assist having an electric motor that may be used exclusively to propel 6 such bicycle, and that is not capable of providing assistance when such 7 bicycle reaches a speed of [twenty] twenty-eight miles per hour. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02374-01-5